Massachusetts, session 194th, H1530.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 20 of chapter 40B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by striking the definition of “Consistent with local needs”, and inserting in place thereof the
following new definition:-
“Consistent with local needs”, requirements and regulations shall be considered
consistent with local needs if they are reasonable in view of the regional need for low and
moderate income housing considered with the number of low income persons in the city or town
affected and the need to protect the health or safety of the occupants of the proposed housing or
of the residents of the city or town, to promote better site and building design in relation to the
surroundings, to preserve the municipal water supply or the region’s natural water resources, or
to preserve open spaces, and if such requirements and regulations are applied as equally as
of 2

possible to both subsidized and unsubsidized housing. Requirements or regulations shall be
consistent with local needs when imposed by a board of zoning appeals after a comprehensive
hearing in a city or town where (1) low or moderate income housing exists which is in excess of
ten percent of the housing units reported in the latest federal decennial census of the city or town
or on sites comprising one and one half percent or more of the total land area zoned for
residential, commercial or industrial use or (2) the application before the board would result in
the commencement of construction of such housing on sites comprising more than three tenths of
one percent of such land area or ten acres, whichever is larger, in any one calendar year;
provided, however, that land area owned by the United States, the commonwealth or any
political subdivision thereof, or any public authority shall be excluded from the total land area
referred to above when making such determination of consistency with local needs.
of 2